Illinois, session 104th, SB1301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Deposit of State Moneys Act is amended by 5changing Sections 16.1 and 16.3 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 520/16.1)  (from Ch. 130, par. 35.1)7    Sec. 16.1. Depository reports. The State Treasurer may 8request, at his discretion, a financial institution, as a 9condition to serving as a State depository of public funds, to 10submit to the State Treasurer a copy of the consolidated 11report of condition and income required to be submitted on a 12periodic basis to a State state or federal regulator of the 13financial institution, and a copy of the financial 14institution's Illinois Community Reinvestment Act statement 15and examination, if available, and a copy of the financial 16institution's federal Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 17statement and examination, if available. Nothing in this 18Section, however, shall require a financial institution to 19submit any document or part thereof deemed to be confidential 20by a State or federal regulator of the financial institution.21(Source: P.A. 87-510.) 22    (15 ILCS 520/16.3)  SB1301 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08229 SPS 18279 b1    Sec. 16.3. Consideration of financial institution's 2commitment to its community.3    (a) In addition to any other requirements of this Act, the 4State Treasurer shall consider the financial institution's 5record and current level of financial commitment to its local 6community when deciding whether to deposit State funds in that 7financial institution. The State Treasurer may consider 8factors, including, but not necessarily limited to: 9        (1) for financial institutions subject to the federal 10    Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, the current and 11    historical ratings that the financial institution has 12    received, to the extent that those ratings are publicly 13    available, under the federal Community Reinvestment Act of 14    1977;15        (1.5) for financial institutions subject to the 16    Illinois Community Reinvestment Act, the current and 17    historical ratings that the financial institution has 18    received under the Illinois Community Reinvestment Act, to 19    the extent that those ratings are publicly available; 20        (2) any changes in ownership, management, policies, or 21    practices of the financial institution that may affect the 22    level of the financial institution's commitment to its 23    community; 24        (3) the financial impact that the withdrawal or denial 25    of deposits of State funds might have on the financial 26    institution; and   SB1301 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08229 SPS 18279 b1        (4) the financial impact to the State as a result of 2    withdrawing State funds or refusing to deposit additional 3    State funds in the financial institution.4    (a-5) Effective January 1, 2022, no State funds may be 5deposited in a financial institution subject to the federal 6Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 unless the institution has 7a current rating of satisfactory or outstanding under the 8Community Reinvestment Act of 1977.9    (a-6) Effective January 1, 2026, no State funds may be 10deposited in a financial institution subject to the Illinois 11Community Reinvestment Act unless either (i) the institution 12has a current rating of satisfactory or outstanding under the 13Illinois Community Reinvestment Act at the time of deposit or 14(ii) the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 15has not yet completed its initial examination of the 16institution pursuant to the Illinois Community Reinvestment 17Act. State funds that have been deposited may not be withdrawn 18from a financial institution prior to the date of maturity 19solely on the basis of a less than satisfactory rating under 20the Illinois Community Reinvestment Act.21    (a-10) When investing or depositing State funds, the State 22Treasurer may give preference to financial institutions that 23have a current rating of outstanding under the federal 24Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 and the Illinois Community 25Reinvestment Act.26    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as   SB1301 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08229 SPS 18279 b1authorizing the State Treasurer to conduct an examination or 2investigation of a financial institution or to receive 3information that is not publicly available and the disclosure 4of which is otherwise prohibited by law.5(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 3-23-21.) 6    Section 10. The Public Funds Investment Act is amended by 7changing Section 8 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 235/8)9    Sec. 8. Consideration of financial institution's 10commitment to its community.11    (a) In addition to any other requirements of this Act, a 12public agency shall consider the financial institution's 13record and current level of financial commitment to its local 14community when deciding whether to deposit public funds in 15that financial institution. The public agency may consider 16factors including, but not necessarily limited to: 17        (1) for financial institutions subject to the federal 18    Community Reinvestment Act of 1977, the current and 19    historical ratings that the financial institution has 20    received, to the extent that those ratings are publicly 21    available, under the federal Community Reinvestment Act of 22    1977;23        (1.5) for financial institutions subject to the 24    Illinois Community Reinvestment Act, the current and   SB1301 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08229 SPS 18279 b1    historical ratings that the financial institution has 2    received under the Illinois Community Reinvestment Act, to 3    the extent that those ratings are publicly available; 4        (2) any changes in ownership, management, policies, or 5    practices of the financial institution that may affect the 6    level of the financial institution's commitment to its 7    community; 8        (3) the financial impact that the withdrawal or denial 9    of deposits of public funds might have on the financial 10    institution; 11        (4) the financial impact to the public agency as a 12    result of withdrawing public funds or refusing to deposit 13    additional public funds in the financial institution; and 14        (5) any additional burden on the resources of the 15    public agency that might result from ceasing to maintain 16    deposits of public funds at the financial institution 17    under consideration.18    (a-5) Effective January 1, 2022, no public funds may be 19deposited in a financial institution subject to the federal 20Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 unless the institution has 21a current rating of satisfactory or outstanding under the 22Community Reinvestment Act of 1977.23    (a-6) Effective January 1, 2026, no public funds may be 24deposited in a financial institution subject to the Illinois 25Community Reinvestment Act unless either (i) the institution 26has a current rating of satisfactory or outstanding under the   SB1301 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08229 SPS 18279 b1Illinois Community Reinvestment Act at the time of deposit or 2(ii) the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 3has not yet completed its initial examination of the 4institution pursuant to the Illinois Community Reinvestment 5Act. Public funds that have been deposited may not be 6withdrawn from a financial institution prior to the date of 7maturity solely on the basis of a less than satisfactory 8rating under the Illinois Community Reinvestment Act.9    (a-10) When investing or depositing public funds, the 10public agency may give preference to financial institutions 11that have a current rating of outstanding under the federal 12Community Reinvestment Act of 1977 and the Illinois Community 13Reinvestment Act.14    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as 15authorizing the public agency to conduct an examination or 16investigation of a financial institution or to receive 17information that is not publicly available and the disclosure 18of which is otherwise prohibited by law.19(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 3-23-21.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2026.